District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.02

First Source Register created.

(a)

The Mayor shall maintain a First Source Register. The First Source Register is the Department of Employment Services Automated Applicant File, which consists of the names of unemployed District residents registered with the Department of Employment Services.

(b)

In compiling and maintaining the First Source Register the Mayor shall contact community organizations, advisory neighborhood commissions, civic and citizen associations, and project area committees for names of unemployed District residents.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-93, § 3, 31 DCR 2545
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-210, § 2(b), 40 DCR 19
1981 Ed., § 1-1162.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-93, see Mayor’s Order 86-66, April 22, 1986.